Hawaii statutes.
§264-1 Public highways and trails. (a)
All roads, highways, alleys, streets, ways, lanes, bikeways, bridges, and all
other real property highway related interests in the State, opened, laid out, subdivided,
consolidated, and acquired and built by the government are declared to be
public highways. Public highways are of two types:

(1) State highways, which are those lands, interests,
or other real property rights, as defined above, having an alignment or
possession of a real property highway related interest as established by law,
subdivided and acquired in accordance with policies and procedures of the
department of transportation, separate and exempt from any county subdivision
ordinances, and all those under the jurisdiction of the department of transportation;
and

(2) County highways, which are all other public
highways.

(b) All trails, and other nonvehicular
rights-of-way in the State declared to be public rights-of-ways by the Highways
Act of 1892, or opened, laid out, or built by the government or otherwise
created or vested as nonvehicular public rights-of-way at any time thereafter,
or in the future, are declared to be public trails. A public trail is under
the jurisdiction of the state board of land and natural resources unless it was
created by or dedicated to a particular county, in which case it shall be under
the jurisdiction of that county.

(c) All highways, roads, alleys, streets,
ways, bikeways, bridges, and trails in the State, opened, laid out, or built by
private parties and dedicated or condemned to the public use, are declared to
be public highways or public trails as follows:

(1) Dedication of public highways, roads, alleys,
streets, ways, lanes, bikeways, bridges, or trails shall be by deed of
conveyance naming the State as grantee in the case of a state highway, road,
alley, street, way, lane, bikeway, bridge, or trail and naming the county as
grantee in the case of a county highway, road, alley, street, way, lane,
bikeway, bridge, or trail. The deed of conveyance shall be delivered to and
accepted by the director of transportation in the case of a state highway,
road, alley, street, way, lane, bikeway, or bridge, or the board of land and
natural resources in the case of a state trail. In the case of a county
highway, road, alley, street, way, lane, bikeway, bridge, or county trail, the
deed shall be delivered to and accepted by the legislative body of a county;
provided that in every case where the highway, road, alley, street, way, lane,
bikeway, bridge, or county trail is constructed and completed as required by
any ordinance of the county or any rule, regulation, or resolution thereof
having the effect of law, the legislative body of the county shall accept the
dedication of the same without exercise of discretion; and

(2) Condemnation of public highways, roads, alleys,
streets, ways, lanes, bikeways, bridges, or trails initiated by the State or
county pursuant to chapter 101, shall be by final order of condemnation by a
court; provided that any private owner of a highway, road, alley, street, way,
lane, bikeway, bridge, or trail may petition the mayor of the county in which
the highway, road, alley, street, way, lane, bikeway, bridge, or trail is
located to initiate condemnation proceedings if the highway, road, alley, street,
way, lane, bikeway, bridge, or trail is part of a public road, ownership has
not been exercised by limiting use or access, or the State or county has
provided some form of maintenance to the highway, road, alley, street, way,
lane, bikeway, bridge, or trail in the interest of the public; provided further
that a private owner may only petition the mayor of a county after the
dissolution of the roads commission established by Act 194, Session Laws
of Hawaii 2016; provided further that in every case where the highway, road,
alley, street, way, lane, bikeway, bridge, or trail is constructed and
completed as required by any ordinance of the county or any rule, regulation,
or resolution thereof having the effect of law at the time of construction and
completion, the highway, road, alley, street, way, lane, bikeway, bridge, or
trail shall be exempt from meeting the construction standards in place at the
time of condemnation by the State or county.

(d) If a privately owned highway, road, alley,
street, way, lane, bikeway, bridge, or trail is deemed to have been dedicated
to or condemned by the State or county pursuant to subsection (c), the State or
county shall be exempt for a period of three years from any state laws or rules
adopted pursuant thereto that would require the State or county to perform
construction, reconstruction, preservation, resurfacing, restoration, or
rehabilitation upon it.

(e) All county public highways and trails once
established shall continue until vacated, closed, abandoned, or discontinued by
a resolution of the legislative body of the county wherein the county highway
or trail lies. All state trails once established shall continue until lawfully
disposed of pursuant to the requirements of chapter 171. [L 1892, c 47, §2; RL
1945, §6111; am L 1947, c 142, pt of §1; am L 1949, c 74, §2; RL 1955, §142-1;
am L 1957, c 155, §1; am L 1963, c 190, §1; HRS §264-1; am L 1977, c 68, §4; am
L 1988, c 150, §1; am L 2008, c 12, §1; am L 2016, c 194, §3]

Cross References

Construction of facilities for physically handicapped
persons, see §286-9.

Highways, maintenance, see §27-31.

Attorney General Opinions

Public highway does not include proposed road not yet
constructed. Att. Gen. Op. 63-54.

Case Notes

In absence of statute no particular form or ceremony is
requisite in the dedication. 2 H. 118.

Defendant claiming right-of-way as a public highway cannot
extend such right by using path in different or enlarged manner than usual
custom. 2 H. 307.

Implied consent. 17 H. 523.

Territory cannot acquire fee in public highway by legislative
enactment; only by condemnation or consent of owner. 17 H. 523.

A public highway can be closed only by the method prescribed
by statute. 19 H. 168.

Lease of public land does not extinguish a highway existing
across it. 19 H. 168.

Park road not public. 38 H. 592.

Seawall used as a public thoroughfare is included in term
"public highways". 50 H. 497, 443 P.2d 142.

State which holds open a public thoroughfare for travel has
duty to maintain it in condition safe for travel. 50 H. 497, 443 P.2d 142.

Ownership of fee underlying a road built by private parties
and abandoned to the public. 50 H. 567, 445 P.2d 538.

Implied dedication by designation of roadways on subdivision
maps. 55 H. 305, 517 P.2d 779.

A responsible government has a duty to keep its highways in
safe condition. 57 H. 656, 562 P.2d 436.

Not applicable where trustees did not build or lay out a
trail to the general public. 73 H. 297, 832 P.2d 724.

A highway is not a county highway unless it is accepted or
adopted as such by the county council. 2 H. App. 387, 633 P.2d 1118; 6 H. App.
414, 724 P.2d 118.

A public highway is not a state highway unless it is
designated for inclusion in the state highway system under §264-41. 2 H. App.
387, 633 P.2d 1118.

Cited: 29 H. 820, 822, aff'd 188 F.2d 459.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next